Nevada, session 83, AB536.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 370.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.010 “Cigarette” means all rolled tobacco or substitutes
therefor that is wrapped in paper or any substitute other than
tobacco [,] and is intended to be heated or burned under ordinary
conditions of use, irrespective of size or shape and whether or not
the tobacco is flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other
ingredient.
Sec. 2. NRS 370.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.015 “Cigarette vending machine operator” means any
retail dealer licensed to sell only Nevada stamped cigarettes that are
intended to be burned under ordinary conditions of use by means
of coin-operated machines anywhere in Nevada.
Sec. 3. NRS 370.054 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.054 “Vapor product”:
1. Means any noncombustible product containing nicotine or
any other substance that employs a heating element, power source,
electronic circuit or other electronic, chemical or mechanical means,
regardless of the shape or size thereof, that can be used to produce
vapor from nicotine or any other substance in a solution or other
form, the use or inhalation of which simulates smoking.
2. Includes, without limitation:
(a) An electronic cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah, or vape
pen, or a similar product or device; and
-
*AB536*

– 3 –
(b) The components of such a product or device, whether or not
sold separately, including, without limitation, vapor cartridges or
other container of nicotine or any other substance in a solution or
other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic
cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah, or vape pen, or a similar
product or device, atomizers, cartomizers, digital displays,
clearomizers, tank systems, flavors, programmable software or other
similar products or devices. As used in this paragraph, “component”
means a product intended primarily or exclusively to be used with or
in an electronic cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah, or vape pen,
or a similar product or device.
3. Does not include any product:
(a) Regulated by the United States Food and Drug
Administration pursuant to subchapter V of the Federal Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
(b) Subject to the excise tax on cannabis or cannabis products
pursuant to NRS 372A.200 to 372A.380, inclusive.
(c) Purchased by a person who holds a current, valid medical
cannabis establishment license pursuant to chapter 678B of NRS.
(d) Subject to an excise tax on cigarettes pursuant to NRS
370.0751, 370.165 or 370.350.
(e) That includes a device to heat a cigarette that is heated but
not burned under ordinary conditions of use.
Sec. 4. NRS 370.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.165 [There] 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, there is hereby levied a tax upon the purchase or
possession of cigarettes by a consumer in the State of Nevada at the
rate of 90 mills per cigarette. The tax upon the purchase or
possession of cigarettes by a consumer in the State of Nevada must
be levied at a rate of 45 mills per cigarette if:
(a) The cigarettes are intended to be heated but not burned
under ordinary conditions of use;
(b) The United States Food and Drug Administration has
approved the product to be commercially marketed and distributed
in interstate commerce as a modified risk tobacco product
pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387k; and
(c) The most recent postmarket surveillance and study
conducted for the product pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 387k(i)
indicates that less than 5 percent of persons under the age of 18
years have used the product.
2. The tax may be represented and precollected by the affixing
of a revenue stamp or other approved evidence of payment to each
package, packet or container in which cigarettes are sold. The tax
must be precollected by the wholesale or retail dealer, and must be
recovered from the consumer by adding the amount of the tax to the
-
*AB536*

– 4 –
selling price. Each person who sells cigarettes at retail shall
prominently display on the premises a notice that the tax is included
in the selling price and is payable under the provisions of this
chapter.
Sec. 5. NRS 370.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.270 1. Each retail dealer shall, not later than 5 calendar
days after the retail dealer takes possession of a package of
cigarettes, see that the package has the Nevada cigarette stamp
properly affixed.
2. Every cigarette vending machine operator placing in his or
her coin-operated cigarette vending machines cigarettes [in his or
her coin-operated cigarette vending machines] that are intended to
be burned under ordinary conditions of use for sale to the ultimate
consumers shall at the time of placing them in the machine see that
each package has the Nevada cigarette stamp properly affixed.
3. No unstamped packages of cigarettes may lawfully be
accepted or held in the possession of any person, except as
authorized by law or regulation. For the purposes of this subsection,
“held in possession” means:
(a) In the actual possession of the person; or
(b) In the constructive possession of the person when cigarettes
are being transported or held for the person or for his or her
designee by another person. Constructive possession is deemed to
occur at the location of the cigarettes being transported or held.
4. Any cigarettes found in the possession of any person except
a person authorized by law or regulation to possess them, which do
not bear such identifying marks as are necessary to ascertain the
origin of the cigarettes and numbering in a legible manner on the
Nevada excise tax stamp, must be seized by the Department or any
of its agents, and caused to be stamped by a licensed wholesale
dealer, or confiscated and sold by the Department or its agents to the
highest bidder among the licensed wholesale dealers in this State
after due notice to all licensed Nevada wholesale dealers has been
given by mail to the addresses contained in the Department’s
records. If there is no bidder, or in the opinion of the Department the
quantity of the cigarettes is insufficient, or for any other reason such
disposition would be impractical, the cigarettes must be destroyed or
disposed of as the Department may see fit. The proceeds of all sales
must be classed as revenues derived under the provisions of NRS
370.007 to 370.430, inclusive.
5. Any cigarette vending machine in which unstamped
cigarettes are found may be so seized and sold to the highest bidder.
Sec. 6. NRS 370.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.380 1. It is unlawful for a person, with the intent to
defraud the State:
-
*AB536*

– 5 –
(a) To alter, forge or counterfeit any license or stamp provided
for in this chapter;
(b) To have in his or her possession any forged, counterfeited,
spurious or altered license or stamp with the intent to use the same,
knowing or having reasonable grounds to believe the same to be
such;
(c) To have in his or her possession one or more cigarette
stamps which he or she knows have been removed from the pieces
of packages or packages of cigarettes to which they were affixed;
(d) To affix to any piece of a package or package of cigarettes a
stamp which he or she knows has been removed from any other
piece of a package or package of cigarettes; or
(e) To have in his or her possession for the purpose of sale
cigarettes which do not bear indicia of the State of Nevada excise
tax stamping. Presence in a cigarette vending machine of the
cigarettes [in a cigarette vending machine] that are intended to be
burned under ordinary conditions of use is prima facie evidence of
the purpose to sell.
2. A person who violates any of the provisions of subsection 1
is guilty of a category C felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 7. NRS 370.585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
370.585 A current license as a:
1. Manufacturer authorizes the holder thereof to:
(a) Sell cigarettes from the premises for which the license was
issued to a licensed wholesale dealer of cigarettes in this State;
(b) Ship cigarettes to a licensed logistics company; and
(c) Temporarily store, fulfill orders for or coordinate the
transport or delivery of cigarettes by using a licensed warehouse or
distribution center.
2. Wholesale dealer of cigarettes authorizes the holder thereof
to:
(a) Purchase unstamped cigarettes from any manufacturer who
holds a current license;
(b) Purchase stamped cigarettes from a licensed wholesale
dealer of cigarettes;
(c) Sell stamped cigarettes from the premises for which the
license was issued to any Indian tribe or colony listed by the
Department pursuant to NRS 370.571, to any licensed wholesale
dealer of cigarettes or to any licensed tobacco retail dealer; and
(d) Temporarily store and fulfill orders for stamped cigarettes at
a licensed warehouse or distribution center or through a licensed
logistics company.
3. Wholesale dealer of other tobacco products authorizes the
holder thereof to:
-
*AB536*

– 6 –
(a) Purchase other tobacco products from any manufacturer of
other tobacco products or wholesale dealer of other tobacco
products;
(b) Sell other tobacco products from the premises for which the
license was issued to any Indian tribe or colony listed by the
Department pursuant to NRS 370.571, to any wholesale dealer of
other tobacco products who holds a current license or to any tobacco
retail dealer who holds a current license; and
(c) Temporarily store and fulfill orders for other tobacco
products at a licensed warehouse or distribution center or through a
licensed logistics company.
4. Tobacco retail dealer authorizes the holder thereof to:
(a) Purchase stamped cigarettes from any wholesale dealer of
cigarettes who holds a current license;
(b) Sell cigarettes from the premises for which the license was
issued to any consumer in this State;
(c) Purchase other tobacco products from a wholesale dealer of
other tobacco products who holds a current license;
(d) Sell other tobacco products to any consumer in this State;
and
(e) Temporarily store and fulfill orders for cigarettes or other
tobacco products at a licensed warehouse or distribution center.
5. Cigarette vending machine operator authorizes the holder
thereof to sell Nevada stamped cigarettes that are intended to be
burned under ordinary conditions of use by means of coin-
operated machines within the borders of this State.
Sec. 8. NRS 202.2485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.2485 As used in NRS 202.2485 to 202.2497, inclusive:
1. “Alternative nicotine product” means any noncombustible
product containing nicotine that is intended for human consumption,
whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved or ingested by any other
means. The term does not include:
(a) A vapor product;
(b) A product made or derived from tobacco; or
(c) Any product regulated by the United States Food and Drug
Administration under Subchapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
2. “Distribute” includes furnishing, giving away or providing
products made or derived from tobacco or samples thereof at no cost
to promote the product, whether or not in combination with a sale.
3. “Health authority” means the district health officer in a
district, or his or her designee, or, if none, the Chief Medical
Officer, or his or her designee.
4. “Product made or derived from tobacco” does not include
any product regulated by the United States Food and Drug
-
*AB536*

– 7 –
Administration pursuant to Subchapter V of the Federal Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
5. “Vapor product”:
(a) Means any noncombustible product containing nicotine or
any other substance that employs a heating element, power source,
electronic circuit or other electronic, chemical or mechanical means,
regardless of the shape or size thereof, that can be used to produce
vapor from nicotine or any other substance in a solution or other
form, the use or inhalation of which simulates smoking.
(b) Includes, without limitation:
(1) An electronic cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah, or
vape pen, or a similar product or device; and
(2) The components of such a product or device, whether or
not sold separately, including, without limitation, vapor cartridges or
other container of nicotine or any other substance in a solution
or other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic
cigarette, cigar, cigarillo, pipe, hookah, or vape pen, or a similar
product or device, atomizers, cartomizers, digital displays,
clearomizers, tank systems, flavors, programmable software or other
similar products or devices. As used in this subparagraph,
“component” means a product or device intended primarily or
exclusively to be used with or in an electronic cigarette, cigar,
cigarillo, pipe, hookah, or vape pen, or a similar product or device.
(c) Does not include any product regulated by the United States
Food and Drug Administration pursuant to Subchapter V of the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.
Sec. 9. NRS 202.2494 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.2494 1. A cigarette vending machine may be placed in a
public area only if persons who are under 21 years of age are
prohibited from loitering in that area pursuant to NRS 202.030 or
463.350.
2. A coin-operated vending machine containing cigarettes must
not be used to dispense any product not made or derived from
tobacco.
3. A cigarette vending machine must not be used to dispense
cigarettes that are intended to be heated but not burned under
ordinary conditions of use.
H
-
*AB536*